Utah statutes.
34-44-302.   Other remedies.

This chapter does not:

(1)  invalidate or restrict any alternative or additional right or remedy available to a sales representative; or

(2)  preclude a sales representative from seeking to recover in an action on all claims against a principal.



Enacted by Chapter 65, 2007 General Session

